Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2146
Minimum standards housing ordinance; adopt, when.

Each city and village shall adopt a minimum standards housing ordinance if such city or village has completed an approved workable program or is in the process of the preparation of such a program.

Laws 1969, c. 106, § 6, p. 498;

Laws 1971, LB 747, § 1.